North Carolina, session 2025, SB179.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Department of
Public Instruction the sum of two million five hundred thousand dollars ($2,500,000) in recurring
funds for the 2025-2026 fiscal year to be provided to the nonprofit corporation Voices Together.
The purpose of the funding is to provide programming that is preparatory for Pre-Employment
Transition Services to middle school students who encounter delays or who have intellectual and
developmental disabilities in North Carolina school systems where Voices Together provides
programming at the high school level.
SECTION 2. This act becomes effective July 1, 2025.
*S179-v-1*